Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.910

Effective dates—1973 1st ex.s. c 208.

The provisions of sections 1 through 8, inclusive, 11, 12, 20, 21, 22, and 23 of this 1973 act shall take effect on July 1, 1973. The provisions of sections 9, 10, and 13 through 19, inclusive, shall take effect on January 1, 1976.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 22.]